North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-45 Umbilical Cord Blood Disposition

23-45-01.
Umbilical cord blood — Patient information — Definition. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

If a health care professional is providing prenatal care to a patient, the health care professional may inform the patient of the following options relating to stem cells that are contained in the umbilical cord blood after the delivery of her child:

Discard the stem cells.

Donate the stem cells to a public umbilical cord blood bank.

Store the stem cells in a family umbilical cord blood bank for use by the immediate and extended family members.

Store the stem cells for family use through a family or sibling donor banking program that provides free collection, processing, and storage where there is a medical need.

The method a health care professional uses to provide the information under subsection 1 may include verbally or in writing or by providing the patient with a publication prepared by the state department of health under section 23-45-02.

This section does not impose an obligation on a health care professional to inform a pregnant patient regarding the option of umbilical cord blood collection.

A health care professional who acts in good faith under this section is not subject to civil or criminal liability or professional discipline for those acts.

For purposes of this section, “umbilical cord blood” means the blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 196, §
1.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective August 1, 2011.

23-45-01.
Umbilical cord blood — Patient information — Definition. [Effective September 1, 2022]

If a health care professional is providing prenatal care to a patient, the health care professional may inform the patient of the following options relating to stem cells that are contained in the umbilical cord blood after the delivery of her child:

Discard the stem cells.

Donate the stem cells to a public umbilical cord blood bank.

Store the stem cells in a family umbilical cord blood bank for use by the immediate and extended family members.

Store the stem cells for family use through a family or sibling donor banking program that provides free collection, processing, and storage where there is a medical need.

The method a health care professional uses to provide the information under subsection 1 may include verbally or in writing or by providing the patient with a publication prepared by the department of health and human services under section 23-45-02.

This section does not impose an obligation on a health care professional to inform a pregnant patient regarding the option of umbilical cord blood collection.

A health care professional who acts in good faith under this section is not subject to civil or criminal liability or professional discipline for those acts.

For purposes of this section, “umbilical cord blood” means the blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 196, §
1; 2021, ch. 352, § 260, effective September 1, 2022.

23-45-02.
Umbilical cord blood — Information pamphlet — Distribution. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

By January 1, 2012, the state department of health shall prepare a pamphlet that includes information regarding the following:

The medical processes involved in the collection of umbilical cord blood.

The medical risks of umbilical cord blood collection to the mother and her newborn child.

The current and potential future medical uses, risks, and benefits of umbilical cord blood collection to a mother, her newborn child, and the mother’s biological family.

The current and potential future medical uses, risks, and benefits of umbilical cord blood collection to individuals who are not biologically related to a mother or her newborn child.

Any costs that may be incurred by a patient who chooses to make an umbilical cord blood donation.

Options for ownership and future use of the donated material.

The average cost of public and private umbilical cord blood banking.

As necessary, the department shall update the pamphlet prepared under this section.

The department shall make the pamphlet available on the department’s website and upon request, the department shall distribute the pamphlet at no charge.

A hospital that treats a patient during the delivery of her child shall permit her to arrange for an umbilical cord blood donation as provided under section 23-16-15.

For purposes of this section, “umbilical cord blood” means the blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 196, § 2.

23-45-02.
Umbilical cord blood — Information pamphlet — Distribution. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall prepare a pamphlet that includes information regarding the following:

The medical processes involved in the collection of umbilical cord blood.

The medical risks of umbilical cord blood collection to the mother and her newborn child.

The current and potential future medical uses, risks, and benefits of umbilical cord blood collection to a mother, her newborn child, and the mother’s biological family.

The current and potential future medical uses, risks, and benefits of umbilical cord blood collection to individuals who are not biologically related to a mother or her newborn child.

Any costs that may be incurred by a patient who chooses to make an umbilical cord blood donation.

Options for ownership and future use of the donated material.

The average cost of public and private umbilical cord blood banking.

As necessary, the department shall update the pamphlet prepared under this section.

The department shall make the pamphlet available on the department’s website and upon request, the department shall distribute the pamphlet at no charge.

A hospital that treats a patient during the delivery of her child shall permit her to arrange for an umbilical cord blood donation as provided under section 23-16-15.

For purposes of this section, “umbilical cord blood” means the blood that remains in the umbilical cord and placenta after the birth of a newborn child.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 196, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 261, effective September 1, 2022.